District of Columbia statutes.
47-4303

Suspension of running of period of limitation.

The running of the period of limitation provided in §§ 47-4301 and 47-4302 on the making of assessments or collection shall be suspended:

(1)

Beginning on the day the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia (“CFO”) issues a notice of proposed audit changes pursuant to § 47-4312 for 90 days or until the issuance of a proposed assessment, whichever occurs first; and

(2)

Beginning on the day the CFO issues a proposed assessment, until the issuance of a final order by the Office of Administrative Hearings and for the period during which the CFO is prohibited from making the assessment or from collecting due to a proceeding in court, plus:

(i)

For assessment, 60 days thereafter; and

(ii)

For collection, 6 months thereafter.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 404(b), 48 DCR 334
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-217, § 4(k), 51 DCR 9126
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7082(a), 62 DCR 10905

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-217 substituted “court, and for the period between the filing of a protest in the Office of Administrative Hearings pursuant to § 47-4312 and the issuance of a final order by the Office of Administrative Hearings,” for “court,”.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(k) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-513, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8976).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(k) of Office of Administrative Hearings Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-553, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 10359).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7052(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).